District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.155

Close corporations — Law applicable to close corporations.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, ch. 269, § 155
as added Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(bbb), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.155.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.54.